Tennessee, session 114, SB0990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-1-703(a)(6)(B), is amended by
adding the following language after the last sentence:
The office shall, using existing resources, create and publish a report on the number of
employers that the office has enrolled in E-Verify or conducted work authorization status
checks on behalf of pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0990
003113
- 1 -